South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3945.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Article 5, Chapter 9, Title 50 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 50-9-580.  (A) As used in this section: (1) "Aerial Management Program" or "AMP" means a permit issued by the department to count, photograph, relocate, capture, hunt, or take feral hogs or coyotes by the use of unmanned aircraft. (2) "Landowner's Authorization" or "LOA" means the signed consent from the landowner or agent to manage a specified number of feral hogs or coyotes from an unmanned aircraft on certain property. (B) A person who holds an AMP is authorized to engage in the management of feral hogs and coyotes by use of unmanned aircraft only on the tracts of land specified in the LOA. The AMP must be carried by the unmanned aircraft operator when the unmanned aircraft is engaged in activities authorized by the AMP. (C) An operator of an unmanned aircraft used for the management of feral hogs and coyotes must maintain, on a daily basis, a flight log and report. The daily flight log must be current and available for inspection by game wardens at reasonable times. Each AMP holder and operator must comply with all regulations for the specific type of unmanned aircraft listed on their AMP. (D) It is unlawful for an unmanned aircraft operator or landowner or agent to: (1) count, photograph, relocate, capture, hunt, or take or attempt to count, photograph, relocate, capture, hunt, or take from an unmanned aircraft any wildlife other than feral hogs or coyotes as authorized on the AMP and LOA; (2) intentionally harass any wildlife other than feral hogs or coyotes as authorized by the AMP and LOA with an unmanned aircraft; (3) participate in the hunting or taking of feral hogs or coyotes as authorized by the AMP and LOA without a valid hunting license issued by the department; (4) taking or attempting to take a feral hog or coyote for any purpose other than is necessary to protect or to aid in the administration of lands, water, wildlife, livestock, domesticated animals, human life, or crops; (5) operate an unmanned aircraft for the purposes of this section without being named as an authorized operator in the AMP; (6) take, kill, capture, or attempt to take, kill, or capture on property outside of that designated in the LOA; and (7) using an AMP for the purpose of sport hunting. (E) A person who violates this section is guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction, must be fined not more than two hundred dollars or imprisoned not more than thirty days. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----